District of Columbia statutes.
1-350.12

Rules.

Within 120 days of September 20, 2012, the Chief Financial Officer shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

History

Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 1053, 59 DCR 8025